Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-313
Electric transmission or electric distribution lines; liability; cost of removal.

Any owner of any electric transmission or electric distribution line failing to move its lines, poles, or anchors located near a public highway in accordance with the notice provided by section 70-311 shall be liable to the county or township for the cost of relocating such lines, poles, and anchors. When an owner of such facilities located on private right-of-way is required to move such lines, poles, or anchors, it shall be at the expense of the county or township. The county or township shall be liable to the owner of any electric transmission or electric distribution line for loss of use of such line for failure to give the notice required by sections 70-311 and 70-312.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 476.